Hawaii, session 2026, GM1176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 6E-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending the definition of "complete submittal" to
read as follows:
""Complete submittal" means a packet that includes:
(1) A submittal form;
(2) [A" permit—sot-e-r- -sixty per ce-n-t-comploto project
drawing se-t-; ] An application number;
(3) A site plan that identifies the project area and
locations of ground disturbance;
(4) A written scope of work that identifies the length,
width, and depth of ground disturbance and the
narrative boundaries of the project area;
(5) Photographs of the property and at least one
photograph of each elevation of existing buildings or
structures on the property;
2026-3488 HB1710 CDl HMSO

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(6) A map indicating the boundaries of the project area
that include any associated construction, ground
disturbance, or setting and staging areas;
(7) For projects submitted under this chapter:
(A) A copy of previous archaeological, architectural,
or cultural resource survey for the property; or
(B) A literature review and field inspection for
archaeological resources or windshield survey for
architectural resources for the tax map key or
portion of the tax map key where the project area
is located;
(8) For projects submitted under section 6E-42, a copy of
the building permit application associated with the
project; and
(9) For projects where historic properties are identified
as having a high potential effect level under section
[■6E—6E-42 (h) , documentation of consultation
with the office of Hawaiian affairs and any associated
comments the applicant received from the office of
Hawaiian affairs."
2026-3488 HB1710 CDl HMSO

Page 3 1710
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. Section 6E-10, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§6E-10 Privately owned historic property. (a) Before
any construction, alteration, disposition, or improvement of any
nature, by, for, or permitted by a private landowner may be
commenced that will affect a historic property on the Hawaii
register of historic places, the landowner shall notify the
department of the construction, alteration, disposition, or
improvement of any nature and allow the department the
opportunity to review the effect of the proposed construction,
alteration, disposition, or improvement of any nature on the
historic property. If:
JAL The proposed construction, alteration, disposition, or
improvement consists of corridors or large land areas;
(2) Access to the property or properties is restricted; or
(3) Circumstances dictate that construction, alteration,
disposition, routine maintenance, or improvement be
done in stages or repeatedly executed to ensure the
preservation of historic properties,
the department's review may be based on a phased review of the
project or long-term maintenance of the property; provided that
2026-3488 HB1710 CDl HMSO
liHlillllliiBIIBIH

Page 4 1710
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
there shall be a programmatic agreement executed among the
department, the property owner, and any project proponent that
identifies each phase and the estimated timeline of each phase
or the long-term and repeated maintenance activities that are
S required to preserve the historic property.
( b) The department shall provide written concurrence or
non-concurrence within ninety calendar days, or within thirty-
five calendar days if no historic properties are adversely
affected by the proposed construction, alteration, disposition,
or improvement, after the department has processed a complete
submittal filed by the property owner. The department shall
certify a complete submittal within five business days of its
A11 filing. The proposed construction, alteration, disposition, or
improvement of any nature shall not be commenced, or in the
event it has already begun, continue, until the department has
given its [concurrence or ninety days have clapocd.-- Within
ninety dayo aftc-r notification,—the department-g-hal 1!
- Hr)- Commence condemnation- proeocdi-ngs' for-tho purchase e-f
the historic propcrty-i-f the -dcpartmcn-t- and property
owner do not ag-r-eo- upon an appropriate cours-e of
action-;
2026-3488 HB1710 CDl HMSO
luiliUliiiiinoiiiiiM

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
4-3^- Pormit the-owner to proceed with the owner's
conotruotion,—alteration,—or improvement,'—er
• 4^ In coordination with the owner-,—undcrt-ake or permit
the inveet-igation-,—recording,—prooervation,—and
oalvage of any-hiatorical information -deemed noccaoary
to preoorve Hawaiian hiatory,—by any qualified—agency
for thia purpooc.
- 4fe^] written concurrence or non-concurrence. If the
department fails to provide written concurrence or non­
concurrence within ninety calendar days, or within thirty-five
calendar days if no historic properties are adversely affected
by the proposed project, after receiving and certifying a true
and complete submittal from the property owner, the property
owner may assume the department's concurrence for the proposed
project and may move to the next step in the compliance process.
(c) The property owner shall ensure any application filed
by the property owner for the proposed construction, alteration,
disposition, or improvement is complete and accurate. If the
department;
(1) Determines the application is not a complete
submittal;
2026-3488 HB1710 CDl HMSO 5
■iMiiiBinniuiiui

Page 6 1710
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
Requires additional information or clarification
regarding the physical scope of work; or
(3) Requires an archaeological survey or reconnaissance
level survey for architectural resources,
the department shall notify the property owner and specify the
additional information needed to meet the requirements for a
complete submittal. The review period for the proposed project
shall be tolled until a complete submittal is made to the
department. Once the department has received a complete
submittal, the applicable review period shall restart.
(d) Once the department has provided written concurrence
or fails to timely provide non-concurrence on the project effect
determination and any necessary mitigation measures have been
identified and agreed upon for a proposed project, the property
owner may commence the project, and the project shall be exempt
from further review by the department unless there is a change
to the project's physical scope of work or project area or
unless additional historic properties, aviation artifacts, or
burial sites are identified within the project area; provided
that:
2026-3488 HB1710 GDI HMSO 6

Page 7
H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
(1) If there is a change in the project's physical scope
of work or project area or if additional historic
properties or aviation artifacts are identified within
the project area post-review, the property owner shall
notify the department within forty-eight hours of the
discovery. The notification shall include a
description of the historic property or aviation
artifact and propose actions to avoid, minimize, or
mitigate adverse effects. The department shall
respond within five business days of the notification
with an assessment of the historic property or
aviation artifact and shall provide concurrence or
non-concurrence with the actions proposed to avoid,
minimize, or mitigate adverse effects. The property
owner shall provide the department with a report of
the agreed upon actions when they are completed; and
(2) If a burial site is inadvertently discovered, the
property owner shall proceed pursuant to section 6E-43
or 6E-43.6, or both, as appropriate.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
prevent the ordinary maintenance or repair of any feature in or
2026-3488 HB1710 CDl HMSO
lllll■llllg|lBnllH

Page 8
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
on a historic property that does not involve a change in design,
material, or outer appearance or change in those characteristics
that qualified the historic property for entry onto the Hawaii
register of historic places.
[4^] person, natural or corporate, who violates
the provisions of this section shall be fined not more than
$1,000, and each day of continued violation shall constitute a
distinct and separate offense under this section for which the
offender may be punished.
[4e^] (g) If funds for the acquisition of needed property
are not available, the governor may, upon the recommendation of
the department, allocate from the contingency fund an amount
sufficient to acquire an option on the property or for the
immediate acquisition, preservation, restoration, or operation
IS of the property.
[-{^] (h) The department may enter, solely in performance
of its official duties and only at reasonable times, upon
private lands for examination or survey thereof. Whenever any
member of the department duly authorized to conduct
investigations and surveys of a historic or cultural nature
determines that entry onto private lands for examination or
2026-3488 HB1710 CDl HMSO

Page 9 1710
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
survey of historic or cultural finding is required, the
department shall give written notice of the finding to the owner
or occupant of the property at least five days before entry. If
entry is refused, the member may make a complaint to the
district environmental court in the circuit in which the land is
located. The district environmental court may thereupon issue a
warrant, directed to any police officer of the circuit,
commanding the officer to take sufficient aid, and, being
accompanied by a member of the department, between the hours of
sunrise and sunset, allow the member of the department to
examine or survey the historic or cultural property."
SECTION 3. Section 6E-42, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§6E-42 Review of proposed projects. (a) Except as
provided in section 6E-42.2, before any agency or officer of the
State or its political subdivisions approves any project
involving a permit, license, certificate, land use change,
subdivision, or other entitlement for use that may affect
historic property, aviation artifacts, or a burial site, the
agency or officer shall advise the department and, before any
approval, allow the department an opportunity for review and
2026-3488 HB1710 CDl HMSO 9
iiiiHiiiniiniiiHii

Page 10 1710
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
comment on the effect of the proposed project on historic
properties, aviation artifacts, or burial sites, consistent with
section 6E-43, including those listed in the Hawaii register of
historic places. If:
(1) The proposed project consists of corridors or large
land areas;
(2) Access to properties is restricted; or
(3) Circumstances dictate that construction be done in
stages,
the department's review and comment may be based on a phased
review of the project; provided that there shall be a
programmatic agreement between the department and the project
applicant that identifies each phase and the estimated timelines
for each phase.
(b) The department shall provide written concurrence or
non-concurrence within ninety calendar days, or within thirty-
five calendar days if no historic properties are adversely
affected by the proposed project, after the filing of a request
with the department. If the department fails to provide written
concurrence or noh-concurrence with a project effect
determination within ninety calendar days, or within thirty-five
2026-3488 HB1710 CDl HMSO


Page 11 1710
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
calendar days if no historic properties are adversely affected
by the proposed project^ of receiving a true and complete
submittal for a project^ the lead agency may assume the
department's concurrence and the project may move to the next
step in the compliance process.
(c) The project applicant shall ensure that its
application is complete and accurate. If the department;
(1) Determines the application is not a complete
submittal;
(2) Requires additional information or clarification
regarding the physical scope of work; or
(3) Requires an archaeological survey or reconnaissance
level survey for architectural resources^
the department shall notify the applicant and specify the
additional information needed to meet the requirements for a
complete submittal. The review period for the proposed project
shall be tolled until a complete submittal is made to the
department. Once the department has received a complete
submittal, the applicable review period shall restart.
[4M-] (d) Once the department has provided written
concurrence or fails to timely provide non-concurrence on the
2026-3488 HB1710 CDl HMSO
liHIIHiimilHIH

Page 12 1710
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
project effect determination and any necessary mitigation
measures have been identified and agreed upon for a proposed
project, the appropriate agency or officer of the State or any
of its political subdivisions may commence the project, and the
project shall be exempt from further review by the department
unless there is a change to the project's physical scope of work
or project area or unless additional historic properties,
aviation artifacts, or burial sites are identified within the
project area; provided that:
(1) If there is a change in the project's physical scope
of work or project area or if additional historic
properties or aviation artifacts are identified within
the project area post-review, the appropriate agency
or officer of the State or any of its political
IS subdivisions shall notify the department within forty­
eight hours of the discovery. The notification shall
include a description of the historic property or
aviation artifact and propose actions to avoid,
minimize, or mitigate adverse effects. The department
shall respond within five business days of the
notification with an assessment of the historic
2026-3488 HB1710 CDl HMSO 1

Page 13
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
property or aviation artifact and shall provide
concurrence or non-concurrence with the actions
proposed to avoid, minimize, or mitigate adverse
effects. The appropriate agency or officer of the
State or any of its political subdivisions shall
provide the department with a report of the agreed
upon actions when they are completed; and
(2) If a burial site is inadvertently discovered, the
appropriate agency or officer of the State or any of
its political subdivisions shall proceed pursuant to
section 6E-43 or 6E-43.6, or both, as appropriate.
[4-64-] (e) The department shall inform the public of any
project proposals submitted to the department under this section
that are not otherwise subject to the requirement of a public
hearing or other public notification.
(f) Whenever the project involves the development
of residential units or mixed-use development, as long as a
majority of the mixed-use development is residential, and after
an initial evaluation, the department determines that:
2026-3488 HB1710 CDl HMSO 13

Page 14
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(1) The department will not be able to provide its review
and comment within sixty days of being advised
pursuant to subsection (a);
(2) The third-party consultant has the qualifications and
experience required by subsection [ [ (c)]] to
conduct the review; and
(3) The contract with the third-party consultant:
(A) Requires the third-party consultant to provide a
recommendation to the department within thirty
days of the date that the consultant is retained
to conduct the review and comment; and
(B) Allows the department to reserve the right to
determine whether use of a third-party consultant
was appropriate and terminate the contract if the
third-party consultant:
(i) Has evidenced insufficient compliance with
the state historic preservation laws and
rules; or
(ii) Has not completed assigned historic
preservation reviews accurately,
2026-3488 HB1710 CDl HMSO

■iuiliilwiniiiiinn

Page 15 1710
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
then the department may retain a third-party consultant to
conduct the review and comment described under subsection (a) no
later than sixty days after being advised pursuant to subsection
(a); provided that this subsection shall not apply to projects
that trigger section 106 of the National Historic Preservation
Act of 1966, as amended.
[ [ (Q)-]-] (g) Whenever the department retains any third-
party consultant, including any architect, engineer,
archaeologist, planner, or other professional, to review an
application for a permit, license, or approval under subsection
[-f-H-H-r] third-party consultant shall:
(1) Meet the educational and experience standards as well
as the qualifications for preservation professionals
pursuant to rules adopted by the state historic
preservation division;
(2) Follow state ethics rules; and
(3) Not review any project that the third-party consultant
or the consultant's employer has previously worked on.
[[(f)]] (h) The project proponent shall pay the reasonable
fee requirements of the third-party consultant; provided that
the project proponent may contract with or sponsor any county,
2026-3488 HB1710 GDI HMSO 15

Page 16
H.B. NO. £2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
housing authority, non-profit organization, or person to meet
the fee requirements.
Ail Counties deriving and expending revenues on
mass transit stations pursuant to section 46-16.8 may request
programmatic review by the department for a majority-residential
mixed-use transit-oriented development or residential transit-
oriented development where a permit, license, certificate, land
use change, subdivision, or other entitlement may be required.
[[(h)]] (j) No later than January 1, [2026,] 2028, the
counties and the Hawaii community development authority shall
work with the department to identify and submit to the
department specific parcels and rights-of-way in proximity to
mass transit stations where a majority-residential mixed-use
transit-oriented development, a residential transit-oriented
development, or infrastructure is specifically consistent with a
comprehensive general plan adopted pursuant to section 46-4;
provided that the counties and Hawaii community development
authority shall:
(1) First consult with the department and agree through
memorandum on the mass transit stations, and specific
transit-oriented development parcels and rights-of-
2026-3488 HB1710 CDl HMSO


Page 17 1710
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
way, scoping the potential area for initiating
programmatic review; and
(2) Then solicit requests and consent from non-county
landowners to have their parcels and rights-of-way
within the scoped area of the memorandum initiating
programmatic review to proceed with the programmatic
review process.
[-HiH-] (h) . The department shall review all parcels and
rights-of-way submitted by the counties and the Hawaii community
development authority pursuant to the scoping memorandum and
classify each parcel and right-of-way, within six months of
submittal, according to the risk that a majority-residential
mixed-use transit-oriented development or residential transit-
oriented development may pose to historic properties. The
classification shall be categorized into three categories, in
order of potential effect level from high to low, in the
categories of architecture, archaeology, and history and
culture; provided that:
(1) All county and non-county and Hawaii community
development authority parcels and [-[■] rights-of-way [4-]
for programmatic review shall include the county's or
2026-3488 HB1710 GDI HMSO 17

Page 18
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
the Hawaii community development authority's
assessment of whether development on each parcel or
right-of-way may affect historic property, aviation
artifacts, or a burial site; and
(2) The assessment is based on:
(A) The Hawaii or national register of historic
places;
(B) The age of above-surface structures;
(C) Any existing archaeological inventory surveys
previously accepted by the department;
(D) Any burial treatment plans accepted by the
department;
(E) The type of substrate known to typically contain
burials;
(F) Consultation with the:
Relevant island burial council; and
Office of Hawaiian affairs; and
(G) Any other literary review relevant to the area.
The department shall work with the county that
made the submittal and the Hawaii community development
authority to develop and agree on permitting memoranda within
2026-3488 HB1710 CDl HMSO


Page 19 H.B. NO.
^0°^
C.D. 1
three months of classification regarding development best
practices, including continued identification, addressing levels
of risk for the lower two effect levels in each of the
categories, including but not limited to creating photo
inventories, conducting an archaeological field survey,
archaeological excavation, or onsite archaeological monitoring,
and the presence of onsite archaeological monitoring, and
consider these best practices as standardized for activities
conducted under this section.
A county and the Hawaii community development authority
shall incorporate by reference these best practices as
conditions of approval for any project involving a permit,
license, certificate, land use change, subdivision, or other
entitlement for use.
IS [-H-kH-] (m) Parcels and rights-of-way identified by the
department where all categories are rated in the lower two
effect levels shall be considered to comply with [subocctiono]
subsection (a) or [4^] (d) or section 6E-8 regarding state or
county lands or projects, and any subsequent permit, license,
certificate, land use change, subdivision, or other entitlement
for use shall not require referral to or written concurrence
2'026-3488 HB1710 CDl HMSO

Page 20
H.B. NO.
I . . I ’I 2
C.D. 1
from the department on project effect determination and
mitigation measures/ provided that:
(1) The project is or includes infrastructure to support
the development of:
(A) A majority-residential mixed-use transit-oriented
development; or
(B) A residential transit-oriented development;
(2) The project has reached substantial construction by
June 30, 2036; and
(3) Development activities have commenced consistent with
best practices to address the applicable level of
risk.
[ [ (1)]] (n) Any parcels or rights-of-way characterized as
highest risk shall require referral to the department pursuant
to subsection (a).
[[(m)3] (o) Section 6E-43.6 shall apply in the event of an
inadvertent discovery of a burial site.
[ [ (n)3] (p) The Hawaii housing finance and development
corporation may submit to the department any additional parcels
or rights-of-way for programmatic review if the counties do not
provide a submittal pursuant to subsection [[(h)3;3 (j);
2026-3488 HB1710 GDI HMSO 20

Page 21
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
provided that the same analysis shall be conducted pursuant to
subsection [[ (i)]] (k), and the department shall classify the
submittal within six months of receipt.
[ [ (o) ]■ ] (q) The Hawaii community development authority may
submit parcels or rights-of-way within its jurisdiction to the
department for review, and any parcels or rights-of-way
identified by the department for which all categories are rated
in the lower two effect levels shall be considered to comply
with [aubacctions] subsection (a) or (d) or section 6E-8
regarding state or county lands or projects, and any subsequent
permit, license, certificate, land use change, subdivision, or
other entitlement for use shall not require referral to the
department; provided that:
(1) The project is or includes infrastructure to support
the development of:
(A) A majority-residential mixed-use transit-oriented
development; or
(B) A residential transit-oriented development;
.19 (2) The project has reached substantial construction by
June 30, 2036;
2026-3488 HB1710 GDI HMSO 21

Page 22 ■ ■ ik ■ 1710
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(3) Development activities have commenced consistent with
best practices to address the applicable level of
risk; and
(4) The department shall classify the submittal within six
months of receipt.
[-KpH-] Jr), The department shall adopt rules in accordance
with chapter 91 to implement this section.
[[(q)]] (s) For the purposes of this section, "majority-
residential mixed-use transit-oriented development" means a
mixed-use transit-oriented development project where the
majority of the project is residential and may include off-site
infrastructure."
SECTION 4. Section 6E-42.2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) An application for a proposed project on an existing
privately-owned single-family detached dwelling unit or
townhouse shall be subject to the requirements of section 6E-42
only if the single-family detached dwelling unit or townhouse is
over fifty years old and [46+]
(1) [Listod] The property is listed on the Hawaii or
national register of historic places, or both;
2026-3488 HB1710 CDl HMSO 22
■iiiiiiiiiiniliiliiiiiiiHB

Page 23
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(2) The property is nominated for inclusion on
the Hawaii or national register of historic places, or
both; [ee]
(3) [Locat-ed] The property is located in a historic
district[—]; or
(4) The,proposed project includes ground-disturbing
activity on a property that contains previously
identified burials or cemeteries.”
SECTION 5. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026,
after the amendments made to section 6E-42, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, by Act 306, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, take effect;
provided that the amendments made to section 6E-42, Hawaii
Revised Statutes, by section 3 of this Act shall not be repealed
when that section is reenacted on June 30, 2030, pursuant to
section 7 of Act 306, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025.
2026-3488 HB1710 CDl HMSO 23
niiiiiiiiiHHiiiiiiniiiinB

H.B. NO 1710
H.
S.
C.
Q
Q
Q
CM
(N
T-
APPROVED this 3rd day of June ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1710, HD 2, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1710, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
174-26